Massachusetts, session 194th, H2331.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the ninth paragraph, in lines 123 to 126, inclusive, and
inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
No zoning ordinance or by-law shall prohibit or unreasonably regulate the installation of
solar energy systems or the building of structures that facilitate the collection of solar energy for
residential purposes except where necessary to protect the public health, safety or welfare.
Commercial, governmental, and non-residential solar energy structures and systems may be
reasonably regulated for purposes of (i) protecting public health, safety and welfare; (ii)
preserving forested lands, agricultural lands, or wetlands; or (iii) ensuring compatibility with
municipal zoning.
of 1